Utah statutes.
41-22-10.1.   Vehicles operated on posted public land.
(1)  Currently registered off-highway vehicles may be operated on public land,
trails, streets, or highways that are posted by sign or designated by map or
description as open to off-highway vehicle use by the controlling federal,
state, county, or municipal agency.
(2)  The controlling federal, state, county, or municipal agency may:
(a)  provide a map or description showing or describing land, trails, streets,
or highways open to off-highway vehicle use; or
(b)  post signs designating lands, trails, streets, or highways open to off-
highway vehicle use.
(3)  Liability may not be imposed on any federal, state, county, or
municipality relating to the designation or maintenance of any land, trail,
street, or highway open for off-highway vehicle use.
